Maine, session 132, LD843.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24-A MRSA §4326, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 522, §1, is amended
to read:
4. Report. The operator of the consumer assistance program shall report to the
Attorney General, according to the requirements of the contract under subsection 1 3, on
aggregate data relevant to the services provided by and activities of the consumer assistance
program, and annually, by January 15th 31st, the Attorney General shall report to the joint
standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over health insurance matters on
the aggregate data.
Sec. 2. Transfers from available fiscal year 2025-26 and fiscal year 2026-
27 Department of Professional and Financial Regulation, Bureau of Insurance
Other Special Revenue Funds balances to Department of Attorney General.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on November 1, 2025 and on July 1,
2026, the State Controller shall transfer $300,000 from available balances in the Bureau of
Insurance Other Special Revenue Funds account within the Department of Professional and
Financial Regulation to the Department of the Attorney General, Administration - Attorney
General, Other Special Revenue Funds account.
Sec. 3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ATTORNEY GENERAL, DEPARTMENT OF THE
Administration - Attorney General 0310
Initiative: Provides a one-time allocation to contract with a designated nonprofit,
independent health insurance consumer assistance entity to continue to operate the Health
Insurance Consumer Assistance Program, as established in the Maine Revised Statutes,
Title 24-A, section 4326.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 1 - 132LR1701(04)

All Other $300,000 $300,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $300,000 $300,000
Page 2 - 132LR1701(04)